Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 3
FIRE EXTINGUISHERS - SALE AND USE

Section

9-3-101. Use of toxic fire-extinguishing agents prohibited.

No person, partnership, association, or corporation shall use or install for use in any place of public assemblage, public or private school, hospital, institution, business or office building, apartment building, penal institution, nursing or convalescent home, factory, mill, workshop, bakery, hotel, motel, store, boarding or bunkhouse, theater, motor vehicle used for the transportation of students or passengers for hire, or establishment wherein laborers are employed any fire extinguisher or fire-extinguishing device containing carbon tetrachloride or an active agent having a level of vapor toxicity equal to or greater than carbon tetrachloride. Fire extinguishers acceptable under this article are those covered in national fire protection association's bulletin #10, dated May 19, 1967, entitled "Standard for the Installation of Portable Fire Extinguishers", and national fire protection association's bulletin #10A, dated May 19, 1967, entitled "Maintenance and Use of Portable Fire Extinguishers".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 185, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-5-1.

9-3-102. Sale of illegal fire extinguishers prohibited.

No person shall sell, give, or offer for sale any fire extinguisher or fire-extinguishing device containing or designed to contain any active agent prohibited in section 9-3-101, if such fire extinguisher or fire-extinguishing device is intended for installation and use in any building or motor vehicle referred to in section 9-3-101, or is a grenade type or fusible link release device for use in any of said buildings or motor vehicles.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 185, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-5-2.

9-3-103. Enforcement.

The sheriffs of every county in this state, the fire chiefs of every town, city, and fire protection district, and the safety inspectors appointed by the executive director of the department of labor and employment have full and concurrent jurisdiction to investigate violations of this article and enforce the provisions thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 185, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-5-3.

9-3-104. Violation - penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article 3 commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 185, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-5-4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3145, § 101, effective March 1, 2022.

9-3-105. District attorney to prosecute.

Every district attorney to whom there is presented, or who in any way procures satisfactory evidence of any violation of the provisions of this article, shall cause appropriate proceedings to be commenced and prosecuted in the proper courts, without delay, for the enforcement of the penalties as provided in section 9-3-104.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 186, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-5-5.